Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 5. SANITATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

SUBTITLE C. AIR QUALITY

CHAPTER 389. EMISSIONS REDUCTION RECOGNITION EFFORTS

Sec. 389.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "commission" means the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 967, Sec. 1(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 389.002. USE OF CERTAIN INFORMATION FOR FEDERAL RECOGNITION OF EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS. The commission, using information derived from the reports to the commission under Sections 386.205, 388.003(e), and 388.006, shall take all appropriate and necessary actions so that emissions reductions achieved by means of activities under Chapters 386 and 388 are credited by the United States Environmental Protection Agency to the appropriate emissions reduction objectives in the state implementation plan.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 967, Sec. 1(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 389.003. COMPUTING ENERGY EFFICIENCY EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS AND ASSOCIATED CREDITS. (a) The commission shall develop a method to use in computing emissions reductions obtained through energy efficiency initiatives, including renewable energy initiatives, and the credits associated with those reductions.

(b) The laboratory shall assist the commission and affected political subdivisions in quantifying, as part of the state implementation plan, credits for emissions reductions attributable to energy efficiency programs, including renewable energy programs.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1331, Sec. 18, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 2481), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2005.